Alabama, session 2026rs, HB288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 12-11-41, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§12-11-41
(a) The administration of any estate may be removed
from the probate court to the circuit court at any time after
the issuance of letters testamentary, letter of
administration, or letter of administration with the will
annexed and before a final settlement. thereof, by any heir,
devisee, legatee, distributee, executor, administrator or
administrator with the will annexed of any such estate,
without assigning any special equity; and an
(b) An order of removal must be made by the court, upon
payment of the circuit court costs and upon the filing of a
sworn petition by any such heir, devisee, legatee,
distributee, executor, administrator, or administrator with
the will annexed of any such estate., reciting The petition
must state that the petitioner is such an heir, devisee,
legatee, distributee, executor, administrator, or
administrator with the will annexed and that, in the opinion
of the petitioner, such the estate can be better administered
in the circuit court than in the probate court.
(c) Any estate removed to the circuit court under this
section shall be administered in the circuit court as a trial
de novo unless the parties mutually agree to the record of the
Page 2

de novo unless the parties mutually agree to the record of the
HB288 INTRODUCED
proceedings in probate court."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3